src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!
LEXICON k10e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt10
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT ; ! Double dative.
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k11/18
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
               k11      ;
               k18      ;
!
LEXICON k11 ! ísur
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for ísur
  k11e     ;
  k_flt11  ;
!
LEXICON k11e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_NULL ;
!
LEXICON k_flt11
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k12/6f
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
	         k12      ;
         k_flt6   ;
!
LEXICON k12 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  vinur
  k12e    ;
  k_flt12 ;
!
LEXICON k12_bui
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:i MscObl_Flag ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:num MscObl_Flag ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
   k_flt12 ;
!
LEXICON k12_boe
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:øur MscNom_Flag ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:ø MscNom_Flag ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:ø MscNom_Flag ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:íggjar MscNom_Flag ;
!
LEXICON k12e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
!
LEXICON k_flt12
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k13e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg, giving extra NULL dative then pointing to k12e
         k12e           ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
!
LEXICON k13 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  vegur. As k12, plus a zero dative
         k12            ; 
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
!
LEXICON k14 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  staður
  k14e    ;
  k_flt14 ;
!
LEXICON k14e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;
!
LEXICON k_flt14
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k15/6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
              k15         ;
              k6          ;
!
LEXICON k15 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  gestur
  k15e    ;
  k_flt15 ;
!
LEXICON k15e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ; !s_gen
!
LEXICON k_flt15
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k16/9
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
         k16         ;
         k9          ;
!
LEXICON k16e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
         k15e        ;
!
LEXICON k16
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** having double Cns but pointing to k15
  k15 ; ! Double consonant!
LEXICON k_flt17
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** giving UUML PLDAT and pointing to k_flt15
                k_flt15   ;
  +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
!
LEXICON k17/8/6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 k17      ;
 k8       ;
 k6       ;
!
LEXICON k17
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** giving UUML Dat and pointing to k15
               k15       ; ! Standard, but also u_umlaut
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
!
LEXICON k18/11
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k18 ;
  k11 ;
!
LEXICON k18 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  dansur
  k18e    ;
  k_flt18 ;
!
LEXICON k18e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef+Err/Orth:   MscObl_Flag ; ! dans
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_NULL ; ! s_final
!
LEXICON k_flt18
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k19 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  meldur
  k19e    ;
  k_flt19 ;
!
LEXICON k19e/15e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k19e   ;
  k15e   ;
!
LEXICON k19e/15
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k19e   ;
  k15   ;
!
LEXICON k19e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k_flt19
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k20 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  akur
  k20e    ;
  k_flt20 ;
!
LEXICON k20e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k_flt20
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt21
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** pointing to k_flt19
  k_flt19 ;
!
LEXICON k21/20
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k21 ;
  k20 ;
!
LEXICON k21e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k19e ;
!
LEXICON k21 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  stuðul
         k19       ; ! Can't see the diffrence ==> but:
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ; ! here is the difference
!
LEXICON k22e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k19e ;
!
LEXICON k22 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  himmal
         k19       ; ! himlinum etc.
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ; ! himmalinum
!
LEXICON k23/19
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k23   ;
  k19   ;
!
LEXICON k23e/19e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k23e ;
  k19e ;
!
LEXICON k23 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  róður
  k23e    ;
  k_flt23 ;
!
LEXICON k23e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;
!
LEXICON k_flt23
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k24/25
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
              k24      ;
              k25      ;
!
LEXICON k25/24
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
              k25      ;
              k24      ;
!
LEXICON k26/12
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
    k26     ;
    k12     ;
!
LEXICON k26/6f
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
    k26    ;
    k_flt6 ;
!
LEXICON k27/25
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
    k27     ;
    k25    ;
!
LEXICON k28/12
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
    k28    ;
    k12    ;
!
LEXICON k28/23
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
    k28    ;
    k23    ;
!
LEXICON k28e/12e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
    k28e   ;
    k12e   ;
!
LEXICON k3/1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k3   ;
  k1   ;
!
LEXICON k4/1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k4      ;
  k1      ;
!
LEXICON k45/6f
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k45    ;
  k_flt6 ;
!
LEXICON k6/12e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k6     ;
  k12e   ;
!
LEXICON k6/15
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k6   ;
  k15  ;
!
LEXICON k3e/14f
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  k3e     ;
  k_flt14 ;
!
LEXICON k24 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  fløttur
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLACC    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k25 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  vøllur
  k25e    ;
  k_flt25 ;
!
LEXICON k25e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
!
LEXICON k_flt25
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k26 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  táttur
  k26e    ;
  k_flt26 ;
!
LEXICON k26e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
