src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
germanistikkur:germanistikk k16 ;
autentisitetur:autentisitet k15 ;
stimaknappar:stima#knapp k_flt10 ;
tvíknappar:tví#knapp k_flt10 ;
byggakur:byggakur k20 ;
rugakur:rugakur k20 ;
kavnagli:kavnagl k3/1 ;
eggjakassi:eggjakass k3/1 ;
rótakrampi:rótakramp k4/1 ;
sessur:sess k18/11 ;
formanssessur:formanssess k18/11 ;
durasnapsur:durasnaps k11 ;
sótheysur:sótheys k11 ;
bandhøvil:bandhøvil k21 ;
lungnatuberklar:lungnatuberkl k_flt21 ;
neytatuberklar:neytatuberkl k_flt21 ;
møplar:møpl k_flt21 ;
roknskapur:rokn#skap k12 ;
maimánaður:maimánað k12 ;
stórbýur:stór#bý k12_bui ;
smámunir:smámun k_flt12 ;
landkostir:landkost k_flt12 ;
móðurlutir:móðurlut k_flt12 ;
tummil:tummil k22 ;
tittul:tittul k22 ;
tunnilvegur:tunnil#veg k13 ;
afturvegur:aftur#veg k13 ;
stórfenaður:stórfenað k13 ;
sprongdarróður:sprongdarróður k23 ;
stórdani:stórdan k3e/14f ;
bilverkstaður:bil#verk#stað k14 ;
merkisstaður:merkis#stað k14 ;
miðstaður:mið#stað k14 ;
fingrastaðir:fingra#stað k_flt14 ;
trøstur:trøst k24 ;
ljómtrøstur:ljómtrøst k24 ;
undirvísingartúrur:undirvísingar#túr k6/15 ;
feilur:feil k15 ;
mjónarliður:mjónar#lið k15 ;
fretstingir:fret#sting k_flt15 ;
paraolympiuleikir:para#olympiu#leik k_flt15 ;
hallaspølir:hallaspøl k_flt15 ;
miðvøllur:mið#vøll k25 ;
mararvøttur:mararvøtt k25 ;
blettur:blett k16 ;
gangingarháttur:gangingarhátt k26 ;
táttur:tátt k26 ;
dansisalur:dansisal k17 ;
møtissalur:møtissal k17 ;
stórhvalur:stórhval k17 ;
fingrastavir:fingrastav k_flt17 ;
duradansur:duradans k18 ;
tvímansdansur:tvímansdans k18 ;
fráblástur:fráblástur k23/19 ;
íblástur:íblástur k23/19 ;
stórsigur:stórsigur k19 ;
fremstifingur:fremstifingur k19 ;
rísakveistur:rísakveistur k19 ;
kvørkrar:kvørkr k_flt19 ;
rørar:rør k_flt19 ;
tvingsil:tvingsil k21e ;
bleðil:bleðil k21e ;
seiggil:seiggil k22e ;
alskur:alsk k15e ;
subjektivitetur:subjektivitet k15e ;
teigabøur:teiga#bø k12_bui ;
dani:da3n k3e/14f ;
gaddur:gadd k10e ;
stuldur:stuldur k19e ;
høvundur:høvund k6/12e ;
rithøvundur:rithøvund k6/12e ;
ísturbjølgur:ísturbjølg k12/6f ;
sjangur:sjangur k19e ;
oyðiskógur:oyðiskóg k12/6f ;
poesiur:poesi k12_bui ;
hveitiakur:hveitiakur k20 ;
áarstrekkur:áarstrekk k16e ;
sallur:sall k10e ;
heilasvullur:heilasvull k16/9 ;
tannsvullur:tannsvull k16/9 ;
róðrartrælur:róðrartræl k15/6 ;
mammonstrælur:mammonstræl k15/6 ;
skammur:skamm k10e ;
ennispónur:enni#spón k45/6f ;
hølvispónur:hølvi#spón k45/6f ;
bátaherur:bátaher k6/15 ;
krintilborur:krintilbor k15/6 ;
veðrur:veðr k12/6f ;
presur:pres k11e ;
ættaransur:ættarans k18e ;
ovuransur:ovurans k11e ;
fleygisessur:fleygi#sess k18 ;
sjónissur:sjóniss k11e ;
handarkossur:handar#koss k11/18 ;
fingurkossur:fingur#koss k11/18 ;
dussur:duss k11 ;
tungumussur:tungu#muss k11/18 ;
plássur:pláss k18e ;
froysur:froys k18e ;
heljarmatur:heljar#mat k12e ;
pissigøltur:pissi#gølt k24/25 ;
skræpugøltur:skræpu#gølt k24/25 ;
uttanatlestur:uttanat#lestur k23 ;
omanrakstur:oman#rakst k28/23 ;
innrakstur:inn#rakst k28/23 ;
vekstur:vekst k27/25 ;
kunstur:kunstur k19e/15 ;
gandakunstur:ganda#kunstur k19e/15 ;
svartikunstur:svarti#kunstur k19e/15 ;
parisarkunstur:parisar#kunstur k19e/15e ;
kredittur:kreditt k16/9 ;
leppaluttur:leppa#lutt k16e ;
tyrviluttur:tyrvi#lutt k16e ;
hugsingarháttur:hugsingar#hátt k26/12 ;
ynskisháttur:ynskis#hátt k26/12 ;
útsláttur:út#slátt k28/12 ;
inndráttur:inn#drátt k28/12 ;
virkistáttur:virkis#tátt k26/6f ;
gamanstáttur:gamans#tátt k26/6f ;
festirættur:festi#rætt k12 ;
slóttur:slótt k28e/12e ;
kappslóttur:kapp#slótt k28e/12e ;
hoydøttur:hoy#døtt k16 ;
høttur:høtt k25e ;
eygnaknøttur:eygna#knøtt k25/24 ;
himinknøttur:himin#knøtt k25/24 ;
sáðugreytur:sáðu#greyt k12e ;
klovastavur:klova#stav k17/8/6 ;
skindilstavur:skindil#stav k17/8/6 ;
merkisstavur:merkis#stav k17/8/6 ;
vanheiður:van#heiður k19e ;
næturfriður:nætur#frið k13e ;
ófriður:ó#frið k13e ;
griður:grið k13e ;
kistuviður:kistu#við k12e ;
eftirgróður:eftirgróður k23e/19e ;
nýgróður:nýgróður k23e/19e ;
mjøður:mjøð k25e ;
borgarlýður:borgar#lýð k15e ;
jemmil:jemmil k22e ;
jaksil:jaksil k21/20 ;
jaksul:jaksul k21/20 ;
grunsul:grunsul k21 ;
